North Carolina, session 2025, HB637.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 115C-310.13 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-310.13. Advanced teaching roles salary supplements.
(a) ATR units may designate up to fifteen percent (15%) of the teachers in each ATR
school as adult leadership teachers and five percent (5%) of the teachers in each ATR school as
classroom excellence teachers. To the extent funds are made available for the purpose, teachers
serving in an advanced teaching role are eligible to receive salary supplements as follows:ATR
units shall be allocated funds for salary supplements in the following amounts for each teacher
identified as serving in the following advanced teaching roles:
(1) Ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for adult leadership teachers.
(2) Three thousand dollars ($3,000) for classroom excellence teachers.
(a1) The salary supplement for an adult leadership teacher, as identified in subdivision
(a)(1) of this section, may be shared with teachers who team with the adult leadership teacher if
the teachers are in a community of practice addressing an instructional problem of practice in a
school participating in the R3 Program Community of Practice model.
(b) Notwithstanding G.S. 115C-310.5, to the extent funds are made available for this
purpose, the State Board of Education shall award funds to ATR units for annual salary
supplements for teachers, and the receiving ATR units shall provide the salary supplement to
participating teachers in accordance with this section. If State funds are insufficient to cover the
full amount of supplement identified in subsection (a) of this section, the State Board of
Education and the ATR unit shall disburse any supplement funds pro rata. If funds have been
disbursed pro rata, ATR units are encouraged but not required to fund the remainder of the
supplement from alternate funding sources.
(c) The following additional requirements apply to salary supplements received pursuant
to this section:
(1) Loss of a salary supplement received pursuant to this section for any reason
shall not be considered a demotion under Part 3 of Article 22 of Chapter 115C
of the General Statutes.
(2) A teacher is eligible to continue receiving a salary supplement pursuant to this
section as long as he or she remains an adult leadership teacher or teacher, a
*H637-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
classroom excellence teacher.teacher, or a qualifying teacher teamed with an
adult leadership teacher.
(3) A teacher is eligible to receive no more than one annual salary supplement
pursuant to this section at any time.
(d) The Department of Public Instruction shall issue guidance to ATR units on how to
effectively develop staffing plans and budgets, including how to maximize resources across
multiple funding sources and the reach of teachers in advanced teaching roles to a greater number
of students."
SECTION 2. This act applies only to Pitt County Schools.
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies beginning with
the 2025-2026 school year.
Page 2 House Bill 637-First Edition